dict/de-DE.aff
# this is the affix file of the de_DE Hunspell dictionary
# derived from the igerman98 dictionary
#
# Version: 20160407
#
# Copyright (C) 1998-2015 Bjoern Jacke <bjoern@j3e.de>
#
# License: GPLv2, GPLv3
# There should be a copy of both of this licenses included
# with every distribution of this dictionary. Modified
# versions using the GPL may only include the GPL

SET UTF-8
TRY esijanrtolcdugmphbyfvkwqxzäüößáéêàâñESIJANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWQXZÄÜÖÉ-.

PFX U Y 1
PFX U   0     un       .

PFX V Y 1
PFX V   0     ver      .

SFX F Y 35
SFX F   0     nen        in
SFX F   e     in         e
SFX F   e     innen      e
SFX F   0     in         [^i]n
SFX F   0     innen      [^i]n
SFX F   0     in         [^enr]
SFX F   0     innen      [^enr]
SFX F   0     in         [^e]r
SFX F   0     innen      [^e]r
SFX F   0     in         [^r]er
SFX F   0     innen      [^r]er
SFX F   0     in         [^e]rer
SFX F   0     innen      [^e]rer
SFX F   0     in         ierer
SFX F   0     innen      ierer
SFX F   er    in         [^i]erer
SFX F   er    innen      [^i]erer
SFX F   in    In         in
SFX F   in    Innen      in
SFX F   e     In         e
SFX F   e     Innen      e
SFX F   0     In         [^i]n
SFX F   0     Innen      [^i]n
SFX F   0     In         [^en]
SFX F   0     Innen      [^en]
SFX F   0     In         [^e]r
SFX F   0     Innen      [^e]r
SFX F   0     In         [^r]er
SFX F   0     Innen      [^r]er
SFX F   0     In         [^e]rer
SFX F   0     Innen      [^e]rer
SFX F   0     In         ierer
SFX F   0     Innen      ierer
SFX F   er    In         [^i]erer
SFX F   er    Innen      [^i]erer
#SFX F   en    innen        en
#SFX F   en    Innen        en


SFX L N 12
SFX L   0       tlich      n
SFX L   0       tliche     n
SFX L   0       tlicher    n
SFX L   0       tliches    n
SFX L   0       tlichem    n
SFX L   0       tlichen    n
SFX L   0       lich       [^n]
SFX L   0       liche      [^n]
SFX L   0       licher     [^n]
SFX L   0       liches     [^n]
SFX L   0       lichem     [^n]
SFX L   0       lichen     [^n]


#SFX H N 2
#SFX H   0       heit       .
#SFX H   0       heiten     .


#SFX K N 2
#SFX K   0       keit       .
#SFX K   0       keiten     .


SFX M N 10
SFX M   0       chen       [^se]
SFX M   0       chens      [^se]
SFX M   ass     ässchen    ass
SFX M   ass     ässchens   ass
SFX M   oss     össchen    oss
SFX M   oss     össchens   oss
SFX M   uss     üsschen    uss
SFX M   uss     üsschens   uss
SFX M   e       chen       e
SFX M   e       chens      e


SFX A Y 46
SFX A   0       r          e
SFX A   0       n          e
SFX A   0       m          e
SFX A   0       s          e
SFX A   0       e          [^elr]
SFX A   0       er         [^elr]
SFX A   0       en         [^elr]
SFX A   0       em         [^elr]
SFX A   0       es         [^elr]
SFX A   0       e          [^e][rl]
SFX A   0       er         [^e][rl]
SFX A   0       en         [^e][rl]
SFX A   0       em         [^e][rl]
SFX A   0       es         [^e][rl]
SFX A   0       e          [^u]er
SFX A   0       er         [^u]er
SFX A   0       en         [^u]er
SFX A   0       em         [^u]er
SFX A   0       es         [^u]er
SFX A   er      re         uer
SFX A   er      rer        uer
SFX A   er      ren        uer
SFX A   er      rem        uer
SFX A   er      res        uer
SFX A   0       e          [eil]el
SFX A   0       er         [eil]el
SFX A   0       en         [eil]el
SFX A   0       em         [eil]el
SFX A   0       es         [eil]el
SFX A   el      le         [^eil]el
SFX A   el      ler        [^eil]el
SFX A   el      len        [^eil]el
SFX A   el      lem        [^eil]el
SFX A   el      les        [^eil]el
SFX A   lig     elig       [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX A   lig     elige      [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX A   lig     eliger     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX A   lig     eligen     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX A   lig     eligem     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX A   lig     eliges     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX A   erig    rig        [^hi]erig
SFX A   erig    rige       [^hi]erig
SFX A   erig    riger      [^hi]erig
SFX A   erig    rigen      [^hi]erig
SFX A   erig    rigem      [^hi]erig
SFX A   erig    riges      [^hi]erig


SFX C Y 100
SFX C   0       ere        [^elr]
SFX C   0       erer       [^elr]
SFX C   0       eren       [^elr]
SFX C   0       erem       [^elr]
SFX C   0       eres       [^elr]
SFX C   0       re         e
SFX C   0       rer        e
SFX C   0       ren        e
SFX C   0       rem        e
SFX C   0       res        e
SFX C   0       ere        [^e][lr]
SFX C   0       erer       [^e][lr]
SFX C   0       eren       [^e][lr]
SFX C   0       erem       [^e][lr]
SFX C   0       eres       [^e][lr]
SFX C   el      lere       el
SFX C   el      lerer      el
SFX C   el      leren      el
SFX C   el      lerem      el
SFX C   el      leres      el
SFX C   er      rere       uer
SFX C   er      rerer      uer
SFX C   er      reren      uer
SFX C   er      rerem      uer
SFX C   er      reres      uer
SFX C   0       ere        [^u]er
SFX C   0       erer       [^u]er
SFX C   0       eren       [^u]er
SFX C   0       erem       [^u]er
SFX C   0       eres       [^u]er
SFX C   lig     eligere    [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX C   lig     eligerer   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX C   lig     eligeren   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX C   lig     eligerem   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX C   lig     eligeres   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX C   erig    rigere     [^hi]erig
SFX C   erig    rigerer    [^hi]erig
SFX C   erig    rigeren    [^hi]erig
SFX C   erig    rigerem    [^hi]erig
SFX C   erig    rigeres    [^hi]erig
SFX C   0       est        [kßsuxz]
SFX C   0       este       [kßsuxz]
SFX C   0       ester      [kßsuxz]
SFX C   0       esten      [kßsuxz]
SFX C   0       estem      [kßsuxz]
SFX C   0       estes      [kßsuxz]
SFX C   0       st         et
SFX C   0       ste        et
SFX C   0       ster       et
SFX C   0       sten       et
SFX C   0       stem       et
SFX C   0       stes       et
SFX C   0       st         igt
SFX C   0       ste        igt
SFX C   0       ster       igt
SFX C   0       sten       igt
SFX C   0       stem       igt
SFX C   0       stes       igt
SFX C   0       est        [^i]gt
SFX C   0       este       [^i]gt
SFX C   0       ester      [^i]gt
SFX C   0       esten      [^i]gt
SFX C   0       estem      [^i]gt
SFX C   0       estes      [^i]gt
SFX C   0       est        [^eg]t
SFX C   0       este       [^eg]t
SFX C   0       ester      [^eg]t
SFX C   0       esten      [^eg]t
SFX C   0       estem      [^eg]t
SFX C   0       estes      [^eg]t
SFX C   0       st         [^kßstxz]
SFX C   0       ste        [^kßstxz]
SFX C   0       ster       [^kßstxz]
SFX C   0       sten       [^kßstxz]
SFX C   0       stem       [^kßstxz]
SFX C   0       stes       [^kßstxz]
SFX C   0       st         nd
SFX C   0       ste        nd
SFX C   0       ster       nd
SFX C   0       sten       nd
SFX C   0       stem       nd
SFX C   0       stes       nd
SFX C   0       est        [^n]d
SFX C   0       este       [^n]d
SFX C   0       ester      [^n]d
SFX C   0       esten      [^n]d
SFX C   0       estem      [^n]d
SFX C   0       estes      [^n]d
SFX C   lig     eligst     [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX C   lig     eligste    [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX C   lig     eligster   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX C   lig     eligsten   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX C   lig     eligstem   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX C   lig     eligstes   [^aeiouhlräüö]lig
SFX C   erig    rigst      [^hi]erig
SFX C   erig    rigste     [^hi]erig
SFX C   erig    rigster    [^hi]erig
SFX C   erig    rigsten    [^hi]erig
SFX C   erig    rigstem    [^hi]erig
SFX C   erig    rigstes    [^hi]erig


SFX E Y 1
SFX E   0       e          .


SFX f Y 4
SFX f   ph      f          ph
SFX f   ph      fen        ph
SFX f   phie    fie        phie
SFX f   phie    fien       phie


SFX N Y 1
SFX N   0       n          .


SFX P Y 1
SFX P   0       en         .
