dict/de-DE.dic
Anfänger/FNSmgij
Arznei/Pmij
Attentäter/NSFm
Außenseiter/SNFm
Ausbrecherkönig/EPSm
Berner/NSFm
Bett/TMSmij
Bitmaske/Nm
Branntwein/SEPTmij
Bringer/NSFm
Brücke/NMm
Büschel/NSMm
Cousin/EPSm
Dezernent/PFm
Didaktiker/SNFm
Dopplereffekt/STEPm
Eisenacher/NSFm
Entscheid/ESTm
Ernährer/NSFm
Esel/NSFMm
Faulenzerei/Pm
Fisch/EPSTMmij
Friseur/EFPSmgij
Frondienst/EPTm
Fünfzigerjahre/Nm
Geiselerschießung/Pm
Gezirp/STEm
Griechenlandreise/Nm
Hähne/NMm
Heiligabend/SEPm
Heim/EMPSTmij
Held/FPSm
Igel/NSMm
Indikativ/SEP
Inländer/FNSm
Isobar/EPSm
Kanzler/NSFmgij
Keule/NMm
Kneifzange/Nm
Knöpfe/NMm
Kohlenhydrat/EPSm
Kompressor/SPm
Kusine/NMm
Lehnsmänner/Nm
Leipziger/SNFm
Leserbrief/EPSTm
Löffel/NSMmij
Lokal/SEPmij
Meuterer/NFm
Nachfolger/FNSm
Nachfrageimpuls/EPm
Nachteil/EPSm
Ornithologe/NFm
Pferd/EPSTMm
Philosophiestudent/PFm
Pluswert/EPSTm
Pol/EFPSmij
Prozentangabe/Nm
Raupenfahrzeug/ETSPm
Retourenschein/SEPm
Saboteur/EPSFm
Salzlauge/Nm
Schelmenstreich/EPSm
Schiff/EPSTMm
Schnallenschuh/EPSTm
Schwäne/NMm
Schwüre/Nm
Soziallist/dP
Spender/FNSmgij
Spind/EPSTm
Stenografie/Nm
Stöcke/NMm
Teilchenkollision/Pm
Termin/EPSmij
Termite/Nm
Tragiker/NSFm
Treppe/NMm
Unheilbarkeit/Pm
Urknalltheorie/Nm
Vergissmeinnicht/TSEPm
Visionär/EPSFm
Walnussöl/SEPm
Weisheitszähne/Nm
Zahltag/EPSm
Zimmer/NSMmij
Zwickmühle/Nm
abgeschnitten/A
absicht/Pozm
absolvent/FPozm
akzentfrei/A
anfing/ZE
angeknüpft/A
angemessen/ACU
anschaulich/AC
anzeigentechnisch/A
aster/Nozm
aufgebot/EPSTozm
aufgefordert/AU
aufgeschürft/A
auserlesen/AC
ausgegoren/AU
ausgenommen/A
bäuerin/Fozm
ballett/STEPozm
bedenklich/ACU
beflissen/AL
befremdlich/AC
behaglich/ACU
bekannt/ACLU
belastbar/AC
berücksichtigt/AU
bessern/DIVXY
bestritten/AU
betriebsnah/A
biopsie/Nozm
birne/NMozm
bohren/DIVXY
brauchbar/ACU
buchstabengetreu/A
bullig/AC
carotinoid/EPSozm
chinese/FNozm
dampfen/DIVXY
dekanat/EPSTozm
dichotomie/Nozm
differenziert/ACU
disharmonisch/A
drücken/DIVXYW
dünnflüssig/AC
durchführbarkeit/Pozm
ecke/NMozm
ehrlich/ACU
eigen/ALS
eingeschmolzen/A
elegant/ACU
englisch/ACUke
entfiel/ZE
erfurter/NFSozm
erlässlich/AU
ernst/ACL
eselhaft/AC
essentiell/A
ewig/AL
fachgemäß/ACU
fallen/DIV
fett/AC
fidel/EPT
flocht/VZ
fortsetzungsroman/SEPozm
freundlich/ACU
frostbeständig/A
fünfzigerjahre/Nozm
fürchterlich/AC
galt/VZ
gebieter/FNSozm
geboren/AU
geeicht/AU
geheilt/AU
gekrönt/AU
gekühlt/AU
gelb/AL
gelegen/ALU
genau/ACU
genügsam/ACU
geräusch/EPTozm
geschäft/EPSTMozm
geschlechtlich/AU
gesichtet/A
gestirn/EPSozm
getreu/AL
gewöhnlich/ACU
graben/DIV
grauenvoll/AC
griesgrämig/A
harren/DIVXY
heilbringend/AU
hervorragend/AC
hinausgeworfen/A
hinwies/ZE
hiobsgestalt/Pozm
höcker/NSMozm
hüten/DIVXY
hüter/FNSozm
inobhutnahme/Nozm
intransparent/AC
intrigant/AC
keil/SPEozm
klären/DIVXYW
klassiker/NSFozm
kleid/STJRMozm
knusperig/AC
konstrukteur/EPSFozm
kostenlos/A
krachen/DIVXY
kreativ/ACU
lästig/AC
langen/DIVXY
laut/ACL
leidensgenosse/NFozm
lende/NMozm
lieh/VZ
luxuriös/AC
luzerner/FNSozm
maronitisch/A
merken/BDIVXYW
mitspracherecht/EPSTozm
muskulös/AC
nachsichtig/ACU
nationalkommunistisch/A
nehmen/DIV
neuer/L
nilpferd/EPSTozm
nuss/pMozm
österreicher/FNSozm
obsessiv/AC
ouvertüre/Nozm
physisch/A
prächtig/AC
provinzler/NSFozm
prügeln/DIVXY
quittiert/AU
rain/EPSozm
reg/AC
reifungsprozess/EPTozm
rennen/DIVX
rhetorisch/A
salzlos/AC
sandte/VZ
saumsättel/Nozm
scheibe/NMozm
schiffen/BDIVXY
schlucken/DIVXY
schmackhaft/ACU
schmalbandig/AC
schmied/EPSTFozm
schonen/DIVXY
schüssel/NMozm
schwitzen/DIVXY
seiden/Ake
sieh/E
siffig/AC
spannen/DIVXYW
stabilisator/SPozm
stand/VZke
stiefel/SNMozm
stilmöbel/Nozm
stipendiat/PFozm
stößt/V
strukturgleich/A
stumpfsinnig/AC
süß/ACLke
symmetrisch/AU
tilgen/DIVXY
tisch/EPSTMozm
traulich/ACV
trug/VZ
tuff/EPSozm
überreich/AL
übersexualisiert/A
umfangreich/AC
unfallverschulder/FNSozm
ungeladen/AC
unübersetzbar/A
uraufführung/Pozm
verblüffend/AC
verdaulich/ACU
verdiener/NSFozm
vererben/BDIOXYL
verschieden/ACL
verwertbar/AU
vierteljährig/A
vornehm/ACL
wahr/ACLU
warmherzig/AC
weiß/ALke
weisen/DIVX
wesentlich/ACU
westeuropäer/NFSozm
wissend/ACU
wortlos/AC
wünschen/BDIVXYW
zähne/NMozm
zugesprungen/A
zuließ/ZE
